Hawaii, session 2025, SB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a need for a comprehensive approach to controlled‑environment agriculture, which can be accomplished through the construction of a state‑of‑the‑art controlled‑environment agriculture research and demonstration facility.  This type of facility can be established at a commercial scale with research and teaching capabilities at the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's (CTAHR) Magoon research and teaching site in Manoa, Oahu.  Upon completion, the facility and associated activities can serve as a platform for research, extension, education, and demonstration activities at commercial scale to develop the next generation of researchers, industry leaders, and practitioners. The purpose of this Act is to authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds and appropriate funds for the development of a controlled-environment agriculture research and demonstration facility at CTAHR's Magoon research and teaching site in Manoa, Oahu. SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the development of a controlled-environment agriculture research and demonstration facility at the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's Magoon research and teaching site in Manoa, Oahu. SECTION 3.  The sum appropriated in section 2 of this Act shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2050.